New York, session 2025-2026, A819.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subdivision 2 of section 491 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law, as added by chapter 295 of the laws of 1983, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (d) There shall be no fee other than a fee prescribed in paragraph (c) 5 of this subdivision for an amended identification card. There shall be 6 no fee, including the fee prescribed in paragraph (c) of this subdivi- 7 sion, for an amended identification card for an amendment that solely 8 adds a veteran notation upon such identification card that the card 9 holder is a veteran of the United States armed forces pursuant to para- 10 graph (b) of subdivision three of section four hundred ninety of this 11 article. 12 § 2. Subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (d) of subdivision 2 of section 13 503 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 55 of the laws 14 of 1992, is amended to read as follows: 15 (ii) If a knowledge test or [test] tests are required to be passed to 16 secure an amended learner's permit or license, the fees for taking of 17 such test or tests specified in paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall 18 be paid. However, if an amendment is to add only an endorsement or 19 endorsements which require only the passing of a knowledge test or 20 tests, a fee of five dollars shall be paid. If a road test or tests are 21 required to be passed to secure an amended license, the fees for taking 22 such test or tests specified in paragraph (b) of this subdivision shall EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03284-01-5 A. 819 2 1 be paid. If no knowledge or road test is required to secure an amended 2 license, the fee required for such amended license shall be five 3 dollars. In addition, if the fee for the amended learner's permit or 4 license is greater than the fee for the learner's permit or license 5 being amended, the difference in fee shall be paid. If the amendment is 6 only to correct or update a driver's record, no fee other than the photo 7 image fee shall be required. No fee, including the photo image fee, 8 shall be charged for an amendment which solely adds a veteran notation 9 upon such license that the driver is a veteran of the United States 10 armed forces pursuant to paragraph (a-1) of subdivision one of section 11 five hundred four of this article. 12 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.